Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1803.01
Appropriate supervision, defined.

Appropriate supervision means the specific type, intensity, and frequency of supervision determined by an assessment of a combination of factors, which include discipline, level of education and experience of the supervisee, and assigned level of responsibility.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 27.